Massachusetts, session 194th, S2098.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
subsection (dd) the following subsection:-
(ee)(1) As used in this subsection, “qualifying employer” shall have the same meaning as
in 34 CFR 685.219.
(2) A taxpayer employed by a qualifying employer shall be allowed a tax credit against
the taxes imposed by this chapter for employment in public service for a collective 12 months.
The credit shall be equal to $2,000.
(3) The secretary of labor and workforce development shall promulgate regulations for
the credit.
of 1